Oregon, session 2026R1, SB1591.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The Oregon Business Development Department shall conduct a study
regarding the legislative establishment of an inland port in one or more of the counties of
Deschutes, Jefferson and Crook, to be known as the Port of Central Oregon, the purposes
of which are to coordinate infrastructure development, improve trade mobility and promote
economic development.
(2) The study must include recommendations regarding:
(a) A governing body for the port;
(b) Geographic boundaries of the port;
(c) Establishment of a foreign trade zone within the port boundaries;
(d) Budgeting and financing, including bonding authority and taxation authority;
(e) Additional powers, not available to ports generally under ORS chapter 777, that are
necessary or convenient for the Port of Central Oregon to effectuate its purposes;
(f) Methods to ensure efficient use of resources and infrastructure, including through the
application of industrial symbiosis principles;
(g) Methods to promote economic development and multimodal freight systems;
(h) Coordination with federally recognized Indian tribes in this state; and
(i) Potential ownership and operational structures relating to:
(A) The emergency response and training facility in Deschutes County known as CORE3;
(B) The Bend Municipal Airport;
(C) The area known as Juniper Ridge near Bend, Oregon; and
(D) Any other existing or future locations or facilities within port boundaries that may
be used to further the purposes of the port.
(3) The department shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245, and
NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 84

SB 1591
may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim committees of the Legislative
Assembly related to economic development no later than September 15, 2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
SECTION 3. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.

[2]